netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_$swq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$kq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$kq"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$hq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$hq"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$swq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_$hq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$hq"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_$swq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_Q_l">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Q_l"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_21">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_21"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_$kq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$kq"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_$kq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$kq"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_$SQ">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$SQ"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_$swq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_Q">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e lm="JQ1"><par n="ab_ja"/><p><l>J</l><r>JQ</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_$swq"/></e>
    <e lm="mi1"><par n="ab_mi"/><p><l>m</l><r>mi</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="ci1"><par n="ab_ci"/><p><l>k</l><r>ci</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="kq2"><par n="ab_ca"/><i>k</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$kq"/></e>
    <e lm="vq1"><par n="ab_va"/><i>v</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$kq"/></e>
    <e lm="Xu1"><par n="ab_xu"/><p><l>X</l><r>Xu</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="XU1"><par n="ab_xu"/><i>X</i><par n="md_U"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="pq2"><par n="ab_pa"/><p><l>p</l><r>pq</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$hq"/></e>
    <e lm="smq2"><par n="ab_sa"/><p><l>sm</l><r>smq</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$swq"/></e>
    <e lm="RaG1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_a_e"/><i>G</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ah2"><par n="ab_a_A"/><i>h</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kRi2"><par n="ab_ci"/><p><l>kR</l><r>kRi</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_iy"/></e>
    <e lm="jiri1"><i>jir</i><par n="mr_i_ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="xASa1"><par n="ab_xa"/><i>xAS</i><par n="md_a"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="xq2"><par n="ab_xa"/><i>x</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_$hq"/></e>
    <e lm="qkRi1"><i>qkR</i><par n="mr_i_ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="xqP1"><par n="ab_xa"/><i>xqP</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="unB1"><i>u</i><par n="mr_n_m"/><i>B</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="cil1"><par n="ab_ci"/><i>cil</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="mut2"><par n="ab_mu"/><i>mut</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="gU1"><par n="ab_ju"/><i>g</i><par n="md_U"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="Xi1"><par n="ab_xi"/><p><l>X</l><r>Xi</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="kRi3"><par n="ab_ci"/><p><l>kR</l><r>kRi</r></p><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_iy"/></e>
    <e lm="gQ1"><par n="ab_ja"/><p><l>g</l><r>gQ</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_$swq"/></e>
    <e lm="gQ1"><par n="ab_ja"/><p><l>g</l><r>gQ</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_Q_l"/></e>
    <e lm="xq3"><par n="up_A"/><par n="ab_xa"/><i>x</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_$hq"/></e>
    <e lm="wqx1"><par n="ab_wa"/><i>wq</i><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_21"/></e>
    <e lm="wqh4"><par n="ab_wa"/><i>wqh</i><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="his1"><par n="ab_ji"/><i>hi</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>s</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="unx1"><i>unx</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_ruXAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="man2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_a_e"/><i>n</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="kq3"><par n="ab_ca"/><i>k</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wanAxi_$kq"/></e>
    <e lm="pU2"><par n="ab_pu"/><p><l>p</l><r>pU</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="xQ2"><par n="ab_xa"/><p><l>x</l><r>xQ</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_$SQ"/></e>
    <e lm="nQ2"><par n="ab_na"/><p><l>n</l><r>nQ</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_$swq"/></e>
    <e lm="Q1"><i></i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="rI2"><par n="ab_ri"/><p><l>r</l><r>rI</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="BrI1"><par n="ab_bi"/><p><l>Br</l><r>BrI</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_iy"/></e>
    <e lm="vq2"><par n="ab_va"/><i>v</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_$kq"/></e>
    <e lm="kliS2"><par n="ab_ci"/><i>kliS</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="grah1"><par n="ab_ja"/><i>g</i><par n="mr_ra_q"/><i>h</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="mux2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>x</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_Am"/></e>
